District of Columbia statutes.
7-2125

Compliance.

The Department of Health shall determine compliance with the requirements of this chapter. The failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter may result in a civil fine to be determined by the Mayor.

History

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-346, § 6, 56 DCR 966